src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc
LEXICON Exceptions
!! Verbs
! V_sein__vbser !!= * @CODE@ sein:
sein+V+Prf:gewesen # ;  
sein+V+Inf00:sein # ;
sein+V+PrsPrc+Pos:seiend A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

sein+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:bin  # ;
sein+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:bi%>st # ;
sein+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ist  # ;
sein+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:sind # ;
sein+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:seid  # ;
sein+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:sind # ;

sein+V:war IND-PRT_SEIN ;
sein+V:sei SUBJ-PRS_SEIN ;

sein+V:war%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
sein+V+Imprt+Sg2:sei # ;
sein+V+Imprt+Pl2:sei%>d # ;
